Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-922
Department; adopt rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations and perform all other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, rules and regulations relating to fees charged, training of personnel, and administration of the program.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 7.